Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE B. LAW ENFORCEMENT AND PUBLIC PROTECTION

CHAPTER 413. CRIMINAL JUSTICE POLICY COUNCIL

Sec. 413.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "policy council" means the Criminal Justice Policy Council.

Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 298, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 413.002. CRIMINAL JUSTICE POLICY COUNCIL. The Criminal Justice Policy Council is an agency of the state.

Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 298, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 413.004. EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR. (a) The policy council is under the direction of an executive director.

(b) The executive director is appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The appointment of an executive director shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointee.

(c) A person is not eligible for appointment as the executive director if the person or the person's spouse:

(1) is employed by or participates in the management of a business entity or other organization receiving funds from the policy council;

(2) owns or controls, directly or indirectly, more than a 10 percent interest in a business entity or other organization receiving funds from the policy council; or

(3) uses or receives a substantial amount of tangible goods, services, or funds from the policy council, other than compensation or reimbursement authorized by law for the executive director.

(d) The executive director may not work for any agency or office of the state other than the policy council and may not perform duties for any other state agency or office that negatively affect the performance of the executive director's duties as executive director of the policy council.

(e) It is a ground for removal from the position of executive director if the appointee:

(1) is disqualified for the position under Subsection (c) or engages in an activity after appointment that, under Subsection (c), would have disqualified the person for appointment to the position;

(2) violates a prohibition established by Subsection (d) or Section 413.006; or

(3) cannot because of illness or disability discharge the executive director's duties.

Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 298, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 413.005. STAFF. (a) The executive director may employ personnel necessary to administer the responsibilities of the policy council.

(b) The executive director or the executive director's designee shall provide to policy council employees, as often as necessary, information regarding their qualification for employment under this chapter and their responsibilities under applicable laws relating to standards of conduct for state employees.

(c) The executive director or the executive director's designee shall develop an intra-agency career ladder program that addresses opportunities for mobility and advancement for employees within the policy council. The program shall require intra-agency posting of all positions concurrently with any public posting.

(d) The executive director or the executive director's designee shall develop a system of annual performance evaluations that are based on documented employee performance. All merit pay for policy council employees must be based on the system established under this subsection.

(e) The executive director or the executive director's designee shall prepare and maintain a written policy statement to assure implementation of a program of equal employment opportunity under which all personnel transactions are made without regard to race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin. The policy statement must include:

(1) personnel policies, including policies relating to recruitment, evaluation, selection, appointment, training, and promotion of personnel that are in compliance with requirements of Chapter 21, Labor Code;

(2) a comprehensive analysis of the policy council work force that meets federal and state guidelines;

(3) procedures by which a determination can be made about the extent of underuse in the policy council work force of all persons for whom federal or state guidelines encourage a more equitable balance; and

(4) reasonable methods to appropriately address those areas of underuse.

(f) A policy statement prepared under Subsection (e) must cover an annual period, be updated annually and reviewed by the Commission on Human Rights for compliance with Subsection (e)(1), and be filed with the governor's office.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083, Sec. 25(32), eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 298, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(32), eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 413.006. CONFLICT OF INTERESTS. (a) An officer, employee, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of criminal justice may not be the executive director of the policy council or an employee of the policy council who is exempt from the state's position classification plan or is compensated at or above the amount prescribed by the General Appropriations Act for step 1, salary group 17, of the position classification salary schedule.

(b) A person who is the spouse of an officer, manager, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of criminal justice may not be the executive director of the policy council and may not be an employee of the policy council who is exempt from the state's position classification plan or is compensated at or above the amount prescribed by the General Appropriations Act for step 1, salary group 17, of the position classification salary schedule.

(c) A person may not serve as the executive director of the policy council or act as the general counsel to the policy council if the person is required to register as a lobbyist under Chapter 305, Government Code, because of the person's activities for compensation on behalf of a profession related to the operation of the policy council.

(d) For the purposes of this section, a Texas trade association is a nonprofit, cooperative, and voluntarily joined association of business or professional competitors in this state designed to assist its members and its industry or profession in dealing with mutual business or professional problems and in promoting their common interest.

Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 298, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 413.007. APPOINTMENT OF OTHER ADVISORY BODIES. The governor may establish other advisory councils, task forces, or commissions the governor considers necessary to advise the policy council or to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 298, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 413.008. GENERAL DUTY OF POLICY COUNCIL. The policy council shall develop means to promote a more effective and cohesive state criminal justice system.

Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 298, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 413.009. DUTIES OF POLICY COUNCIL. (a) To accomplish its duties the policy council shall:

(1) conduct an in-depth analysis of the criminal justice system;

(2) determine the long-range needs of the criminal justice system and recommend policy priorities for the system;

(3) identify critical problems in the criminal justice system and recommend strategies to solve those problems;

(4) assess the cost-effectiveness of the use of state and local funds in the criminal justice system;

(5) recommend means to improve the deterrent and rehabilitative capabilities of the criminal justice system;

(6) advise and assist the legislature in developing plans, programs, and proposed legislation for improving the effectiveness of the criminal justice system;

(7) evaluate the rehabilitative capabilities of a state-administered sex offender treatment program and, based on that evaluation, determine if the program is necessary;

(8) make computations of daily costs and compare interagency costs on services provided by agencies that are a part of the criminal justice system;

(9) make population computations for use in planning for the long-range needs of the criminal justice system;

(10) determine long-range information needs of the criminal justice system and acquire that information;

(11) engage in other activities consistent with the responsibilities of the policy council; and

(12) cooperate with the Crime Victims' Institute by providing information and assistance to the institute relating to the improvement of crime victims' services.

(b) In addition to the policy council's other duties under this chapter, the policy council may perform any function described in Subsection (a) to promote an effective and cohesive juvenile justice system.

Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 298, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 445, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 8.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 413.010. CONSULTATION WITH LEGISLATIVE OFFICIALS. In setting the priorities for the research projects of the policy council, the executive director of the policy council shall consult the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the presiding officer of each standing committee of the senate and house of representatives having primary jurisdiction over criminal justice issues, and the presiding officer of each standing committee of the senate and house of representatives having primary jurisdiction over matters relating to state finance and appropriations from the state treasury.

Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 298, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 413.011. CONTRACTUAL AUTHORITY. The policy council may contract with public or private entities in the performance of its responsibilities.

Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 298, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 413.012. FUNDS; GRANTS AND DONATIONS. (a) All money paid to the policy council under this chapter is subject to Subchapter F, Chapter 404, Government Code.

(b) The executive director shall prepare annually a complete and detailed written report accounting for all funds received and disbursed by the policy council during the preceding fiscal year. The annual report must meet the reporting requirements applicable to financial reporting provided in the General Appropriations Act.

(c) The policy council may accept grants and donations from public and private entities in addition to legislative appropriations.

Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 298, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 413.014. STATISTICAL ANALYSIS CENTER. The policy council shall serve as the statistical analysis center for the state and as the liaison for the state to the United States Department of Justice on criminal justice issues of interest to the state and federal government relating to data, information systems, and research.

Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 298, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 413.016. INMATE RELEASE STATISTICS. (a) Each month the policy council shall determine the following information:

(1) the number and percentage of inmates released on parole or to mandatory supervision to each county;

(2) the number and percentage of inmates released on parole in absentia to each county; and

(3) the number of inmates released to and from a halfway house in each county, including the number of inmates who are required as a condition of release to reside in a county other than the county in which a halfway house is located.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083, Sec. 25(35), eff. June 17, 2011.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083, Sec. 25(35), eff. June 17, 2011.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083, Sec. 25(35), eff. June 17, 2011.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083, Sec. 25(35), eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 298, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(35), eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 9.005, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 413.017. REVIEW OF USE OF PAROLE GUIDELINES. The policy council shall report at least annually to the Legislative Criminal Justice Board, the Texas Board of Criminal Justice, and the Board of Pardons and Paroles on the use of the parole guidelines by each member of the board in making parole decisions.

Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 298, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 413.018. ACCESS TO PROGRAMS AND FACILITIES. The policy council shall comply with federal and state laws related to program and facility accessibility. The executive director of the policy council shall also prepare and maintain a written plan that describes how a person who does not speak English can be provided reasonable access to the policy council's programs and services.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 298, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 413.019. CONSUMER INFORMATION AND COMPLAINTS. (a) The policy council shall prepare information of public interest describing the functions of the policy council and the procedures by which complaints are filed with and resolved by the policy council. The policy council shall make the information available to the public and appropriate state agencies.

(b) The executive director of the policy council shall establish methods by which consumers and service recipients are notified of the name, mailing address, and telephone number of the policy council for the purpose of directing complaints to the policy council. The executive director of the policy council may provide for that notification on each written contract made under this chapter for the services of an individual or other entity.

(c) The policy council shall keep a file about each written complaint filed with the policy council that the policy council has authority to resolve. The policy council shall provide to the person filing the complaint and the persons or entities complained about the policy council's policies and procedures pertaining to complaint investigation and resolution. The policy council, at least quarterly and until final disposition of the complaint, shall notify the person filing the complaint and the persons or entities complained about of the status of the complaint unless the notice would jeopardize an undercover investigation.

(d) The policy council shall keep information about each complaint filed with the policy council. The information shall include:

(1) the date the complaint is received;

(2) the name of the complainant;

(3) the subject matter of the complaint;

(4) a record of all persons contacted in relation to the complaint;

(5) a summary of the results of the review or investigation of the complaint; and

(6) for complaints for which the agency took no action, an explanation of the reason the complaint was closed without action.

Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 298, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 413.022. RECIDIVISM PERFORMANCE REVIEW. (a) The policy council shall develop methods for measuring the success of each program or service determined by the Texas Board of Criminal Justice under Section 493.0053 to be designed for the primary purpose of rehabilitating inmates. On request of the policy council, the provider of a program or service or a representative of Sam Houston State University, the Texas Workforce Commission, or the Texas Department of Criminal Justice shall assist the policy council in developing the methods required by this section. The Texas Department of Criminal Justice shall assist the council by collecting data in accordance with those methods.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083, Sec. 25(36), eff. June 17, 2011.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1360, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.02(7), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(36), eff. June 17, 2011.